Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Article 3. House Trailers

§ 29-7-301.
Persons entitled to lien; notice and priority thereof; removal of trailer by lienor; exception; enforcement and foreclosure of lien; “house trailer”.

Any person leasing or renting space for a house trailer site shall have a lien on any house trailer thereon situated for unpaid lease or rental payments and for other unpaid charges due the lessor under the terms or conditions of any lease or rental agreement. The lien shall be effective after the lessee has defaulted in payments as provided in the written rental or lease agreement. Notice of the lien shall be given by the lessor by causing notice in writing to be posted conspicuously on the mobile home. The lien provided by this section shall have priority over all other liens except a previously perfected security interest in the mobile home.

At any time after thirty (30) days after notice is given the lessor may remove the house trailer from the leased or rented site and retain the lien as provided by this section. On removal, reasonable charges for the removal and storage may be assessed against the house trailer.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, a house trailer shall not be removed pursuant to this section if it is occupied by the lessee. In this case the lessor has a remedy at law.

The lien provided by this section may be enforced and foreclosed as security agreements are enforced under W.S. 34.1-1-101 through 34.1-10-104.

As used in this section “house trailer” shall be defined as in W.S. 31-5-102(a)(xv).

History.

Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “31-5-102(a)(xv)” for “35-1-102(a)(xvi)” in (e).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Quoted

in

Sheridan Com. Park v. Briggs, 848 P.2d 811,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Loss of garageman's lien on repaired vehicle by owner's use of vehicle, 74 ALR4th 90.

Validity, construction, and application of mobile home eviction statutes, 43 ALR5th 705.